Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 34.67, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 34.67. A. The Director of the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services is hereby authorized to shall prescribe forms


and electronic systems to process claims and payroll to be used by


the various agencies of the state. Any agency of the state may file


a claim against more than one item of the current allotments within


funds by indicating on the claim or payroll the account, or accounts


to be charged. The Director shall approve and charge such claim to

Req. No. 1950 Page 1


the account, or accounts, indicated after proper audit of the claim


or payroll.


B. These payroll systems are hereby authorized for use in


claiming amounts due individually to all employees within an agency


of the state. Each payroll record shall show the total earnings,


the amount of each type of withholding and the net amount due each


employee. Withholdings may be reserved by the Director of the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services to be paid to the


proper entity by lump sum payments.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1950 QD 3/31/2025 11:51:31 AM



















Req. No. 1950 Page 2